Utah statutes.
48-2a-905.   Changes and amendments.

If any statement in the application for registration of a foreign limited partnership was false when made or any arrangements or other facts described in the statement have changed, making the application inaccurate in any respect, the foreign limited partnership shall promptly file with the division a certificate, signed under penalty of perjury by a general partner, correcting or amending the statement.



Amended by Chapter 189, 1991 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

